Utah statutes.
53A-15-1003.   Courses and credit.

(1)  The Electronic High School shall:

(a)  offer courses in an open-entry, open-exit format; and

(b)  offer core curriculum courses that are in conformance with course standards and objectives established by the board.

(2)  Public schools shall:

(a)  accept all credits awarded to students by the Electronic High School; and

(b)  apply credits awarded for a core curriculum course toward the fulfillment of core curriculum requirements.

